Washington statutes.
RCW 35.38.050

Treasurer's official bond not affected.

The foregoing provisions of this chapter shall in no way affect the duty of a city or town treasurer to give bond to the city or town for the faithful performance of his or her duties in such amount as may be fixed by the city or town council or other governing body by ordinance.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2075; 1965 c 7 s 35.38.050. Prior: (i) 1905 c 103 s 3; RRS s 5570. (ii) 1907 c 22 s 3; RRS s 5573.]